Washington statutes.
RCW 9.46.0225

"Contest of chance."

"Contest of chance," as used in this chapter, means any contest, game, gaming scheme, or gaming device in which the outcome depends in a material degree upon an element of chance, notwithstanding that skill of the contestants may also be a factor therein.

[ 1987 c 4 s 8. Formerly RCW 9.46.020(7).]